Hawaii statutes.
§291-36 Exceptions. (a) The
director of transportation, in the case of state highways, or the county
engineer, in the case of county roads and streets, may, upon application in
writing, issue a written permit authorizing the applicant to operate or move a
vehicle or combination of vehicles, self-propelled construction or farm
equipment, or special mobile equipment of dimensions or weights, including
loads or both, which exceed the limits set in sections 291-34 and 291-35.

(b) The director of transportation, in the
case of state highways, or the county engineer, in the case of county roads and
streets, may issue a permit authorizing the applicant to operate vehicles or
combinations of vehicles which exceed the limits set forth in section 291-35
when carrying products from the place where they are harvested or stored to the
place where they are processed or used.

(c) The application for any such permit shall
specifically describe the vehicle or combination of vehicles, the
self-propelled construction or farm equipment, the load to be operated or
moved, the particular highways over which the permit to operate is requested,
and whether such permit is requested for a single trip or for continuous
operation.

(d) The director of transportation or county
engineer may if the director of transportation or county engineer determines
that adequate precautions will be taken to protect persons and property issue
the permit and may in the permit limit the number of trips, establish seasonal
or other time limitations during which the permit is valid, prescribe
conditions as to route, equipment, speed, escort vehicles, safety measures, or
otherwise limit or prescribe conditions of operation under such permit to
assure against injury to person and undue damage to the road foundations,
surfaces, or structures. The issuing authority may also require such
undertaking or other security as may be deemed necessary to protect the
highways and bridges from damage, or to provide indemnity for any injury
resulting from such operation. The permit shall be valid for the period
specified or unless sooner revoked by the issuing authority.

(e) Every such permit shall be carried in the
vehicle or combination of vehicles or the self-propelled construction or farm
equipment to which it refers and shall be open to inspection of any peace
officer or traffic officer or employee charged with the care or protection of
the highways; provided that in the case of annual permits, this requirement may
be met where a copy of the permit is carried in the vehicle, and the original
permit is readily available for inspection from the operator's offices in the
county of issuance.

(f) The owner of any vehicle or combination of
vehicles or self-propelled construction or farm equipment found operating in
violation of the terms or conditions of any permit or over sections of the
highway not covered by the permit shall be subject to the penalties provided in
section 291-37.

(g) The restrictions of sections 291-34 and
291-35 shall not apply to the operation of motor vehicles on roads now under
the control of the counties where a private individual or corporation actually
maintains the county road or roads under an agreement in writing filed with the
respective county or city council. The agreement shall also provide that the
individual or corporation shall repair all damages caused to such roads by
vehicles or other self-propelled equipment belonging to or under the control of
the individual or corporation and upon failure of the individual or corporation
to repair such road or roads as provided in such agreement, the county may
repair such damages and charge the cost thereof to and collect the same from
the individual or corporation.

(h) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent
motor vehicles with a width of greater than nine feet, including load, from
crossing any public road, street, or highway within the State.

(i) No provision herein shall be so construed
as to prevent the passage of ordinances by any county which impose restrictions
more severe in nature.

(j) A fee shall be charged for each permit
issued by the director of transportation as follows:

(1) Single trip permit for
loads less than 1.35 times the allowable load or less than 14 feet in width............ $
5.

(2) Continuous trip permit
for loads less than 1.35 times the allowable load or less than 14 feet in width............ $10.

(3) Overweight permit in
excess of 1.35 times the allowable load............. $25.

(4) Oversize permit for
width in excess of 14 feet............. $25.

Such fee shall be deposited in the State's
account for special funds for highways.

(k) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
no permit shall be required for any vehicle or combination of vehicles used in
agricultural operations or activities which only crosses any public road,
street, or highway within the State at locations approved by the director of
transportation, in the case of state highways, or the county engineer, in the
case of county roads and streets; provided that:

(1) The owners of vehicles transporting agricultural
products and equipment shall construct and maintain structurally suitable
pavement sections at each crossing;

(2) These owners shall provide for the cleaning and
removal of all debris and mud generated by their operation;

(3) The maximum length of vehicles transporting
agricultural products shall be limited to not more than eighty feet; and

(4) The maximum length of vehicles, including load,
used in transporting agricultural equipment shall be limited to not more than
one hundred feet. [L 1941, c 216, pt of §1; am L Sp 1941, c 39, §1; RL 1945,
§11715; am L 1949, c 94, §2; RL 1955, §311-21; am L 1957, c 251, §2; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §26; HRS §291-36; am L 1971, c 75, §2 and c 133, §2; am L 1977, c
184, §2; am L 1978, c 192, §2; am L 1980, c 281, §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next